Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1355
Motion to vacate registration.

(a) Not later than thirty days after notice under section 25-1354 is served, the person against whom the judgment was registered may motion the court to vacate the registration. The court for cause may provide for a shorter or longer time for filing the motion.

(b) A motion under this section may assert only:

(1) a ground that could be asserted to deny recognition of the judgment under the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act; or

(2) a failure to comply with a requirement of the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act for registration of the judgment.

(c) A motion filed under this section does not itself stay enforcement of the registered judgment.

(d) If the court grants a motion under this section, the registration is vacated, and any act under the registration to enforce the registered judgment is void.

(e) If the court grants a motion under this section on a ground under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the court also shall render a judgment denying recognition of the Canadian judgment. A judgment rendered under this subsection has the same effect as a judgment denying recognition to a judgment on the same ground under the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 19.

Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act, see section 25-1337.